Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.645

Donor human milk—Milk bank safety standards.

The department shall adopt standards for ensuring milk bank safety. The standards adopted by the department must, at a minimum, consider the clinical, evidence-based guidelines established by a national accrediting organization. The standards must address donor screening, milk handling and processing, and recordkeeping. The department shall also review and consider requiring additional testing standards, including but not limited to testing for the presence of viruses, bacteria, and prescription and nonprescription drugs in donated milk.

[ 2022 c 236 s 5.]